Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Rental rates; state-owned buildings; fiscal year 2026-2027 Notwithstanding section 41-792.01, subsection D, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the capital outlay stabilization fund rental rates for state-owned buildings are $17.87 per square foot for office space and $6.43 per square foot for storage space. Sec. 2. Reporting the sale of state buildings in the governmental mall; fiscal year 2026-2027 In fiscal year 2026-2027, within ten days after the sale of real property that is owned by this state and that is located within the boundaries of the governmental mall described in section 41-1362, Arizona Revised Statutes, the department of administration shall submit a report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the director of the joint legislative budget committee that includes all of the following: 1. The address of the real property. 2. The square footage of the real property. 3. The purchase price of the real property. 4. The name of the fund in which the proceeds from the sale of the real property are being deposited. Sec. 3. Arizona America 250 commission commemorative plaque; procedures; delayed repeal A. Pursuant to section 41-1363, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislative council is authorized to provide for the placement in the governmental mall of a commemorative plaque that recognizes the service of the Arizona America 250 commission and that may include the names of the members who served on the commission and the years of the members' service on the commission. B. The procedures prescribed in section 41-1363, Arizona Revised Statutes, apply to the establishment of the commemorative plaque. C. Public monies are not authorized for the costs of the plaque. All fundraising and contracts for artistic design and construction of the plaque are the sole responsibility of the proponents.  This state may not facilitate fundraising or establish a state fund for the deposit of the monies. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 13, 2026.